California statutes. Public Contract Code
(a) The district shall advertise, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, for contracts for all vessel repair, maintenance, and alteration work if the estimated expenditure exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000), and for all other construction, repair, maintenance, and alteration work, and all similar work, if the estimated expenditure exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), in at least one newspaper and one trade paper of general circulation designated by the general manager, that are published in any one county or portion of a county within the district.

(b) The district shall publicly open the bids and award the contract to the lowest responsible
 bidder as follows:

 (1) For public works contracts that are subject to subdivision (a).

(2) For vessel repair, maintenance, and alteration work contracts.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the district may, at its discretion,
 use informal bidding for contracts as follows:

 (1) For construction, repair, maintenance, and alteration work, and all similar work, with an estimated expenditure that does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(2) For vessel repair, maintenance, and alteration work that does not exceed one
 million dollars ($1,000,000).

(d) The district shall enact an ordinance if it elects to use informal bidding pursuant to subdivision (c) that governs the selection of contractors to perform construction, repair, maintenance, and alteration work, and all similar work, by informal bid. The ordinance shall include all of the following:

(1) Notice to contractors shall be provided in a manner determined by the district.

(2) The notice inviting informal bids shall describe the project in general terms and how to obtain more detailed information about the project, and state the time and place for the submission of bids.

(e) Any contracts for vessel repair, maintenance, and alteration work that does not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) for which the informal bidding procedure adopted pursuant to subdivision (d) is not used shall be advertised pursuant to subdivision (a) and awarded pursuant to subdivision (b).

(f) In case of emergency, work may be contracted without advertising or competitive bidding, provided that the district complies with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 396, Sec. 2.   (SB 622)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

20915.

It shall be unlawful to employ any means to evade the provisions of this article requiring contracts to be awarded after advertising and competitive bidding, including the splitting of projects into smaller work orders, the amendment of existing contracts, or the approval of a subcontract or subcontracts let under existing contracts. Every person who willfully violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

20916.

All contracts in excess of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) entered into by the district for the hiring or purchase of equipment, supplies, or materials, are of no effect unless the district shall advertise pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code for bids for such contracts in at least one newspaper and not more than three newspapers designated by the general manager, which are published in any one county or portion of a county within the district, and unless the district shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

20916.1.

Notwithstanding Section 20916, the purchase of all supplies, equipment, and materials by the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District shall be subject to the following:

(a) When the expenditure required exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the purchase shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder, or, in the district’s discretion, to the responsible bidder who submitted a proposal that provides the best value to the district on the basis of the factors identified in the solicitation. “Best value” means the overall combination of quality, price, and other elements of a proposal that, when considered together, provide the greatest overall benefit in response to the requirements described in the solicitation documents.

(b) To the extent practicable, the district shall obtain a minimum of three quotations, either written or oral, that permit prices and terms to be compared whenever the expected expenditure required for the purchase of supplies, equipment, or materials exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), but does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). 

(c) Notice requesting bids shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation and on the district’s procurement Internet Web site, which publication shall be made at least 10 days before the bids are received. The board may reject any and all bids and
 readvertise at its discretion. 

(d) This section applies solely to the procurement of supplies, equipment, and materials, and shall not apply to construction contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 408, Sec. 3.   (AB 116)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

20916.3.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the award of purchase contracts by the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District under competitive bid procedures may not be feasible for products and materials which are undergoing rapid technological changes or for the introduction of new technologies into district operations. Under these circumstances, it is in the public interest to consider the broadest possible range of competing products and materials available, fitness of purpose, manufacturer’s warranty, performance reliability, delivery timetables, vendor financing, support logistics, and other similar factors in addition to price in the award of these contracts.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may direct the purchase of the specialized equipment specified in subdivision (g) by competitive negotiation upon a finding, by a two-thirds vote of the membership of the board, that the purchase of that equipment pursuant to laws otherwise applicable to the purchase is not feasible or in the public interest.

(c) Competitive negotiation, for the purposes of this section, includes, but is not limited to, all of the following requirements:

(1) A request for proposals shall be prepared and submitted to an adequate number of qualified sources, as determined by the board, to permit reasonable competition consistent with the nature and requirements of the procurement. In addition, notice of the request for proposals shall be published at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation, at least 10 days before the date for receipt of the proposals. The board shall make every effort to generate the maximum feasible number of proposals from qualified sources and shall make a finding to that effect before proceeding to negotiate if only a single response to the request for proposals is received.

(2) A request for proposals shall identify all significant evaluation factors, including price, and their relative importance.

(3) The board shall provide reasonable procedures for technical evaluation of the proposals received, identification of qualified sources, and selection for contract award.

(4) Award shall be made to the qualified proposer whose proposal will be most advantageous to the district, with price and all other factors considered. If award is not made to the bidder whose proposal contains the lowest price, the board shall make a finding setting forth the basis for the award.

(d) The board may reject any and all proposals and request new proposals, at its discretion.

(e) Upon making an award to a qualified proposer, the board, upon request, shall make available to all other proposers and to the public, an analysis of the award which provides the basis for the selection of that particular qualified proposal.

(f) A person who submits, or who plans to submit, a proposal may protest any acquisition conducted in accordance with this section as follows:

(1) Protests based on the content of the request for proposals shall be filed with the board within 10 calendar days after the request for proposals is first advertised in accordance with subdivision (b). The board shall issue a written decision on the protest prior to the opening of proposals. A protest may be renewed by refiling the protest with the board within 15 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of the recommended award.

(2) Any bidder may protest the recommended award on any ground not based upon the content of the request for proposals by filing a protest with the board within 15 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of the recommended award.

(3) Any protest shall contain a full and complete written statement specifying in detail the grounds of the protest and the facts supporting the protest. Protestors shall have an opportunity to appear and be heard before the board prior to the opening of proposals in the case of protests based on the content of the request for proposals, or prior to final award in the case of protests based on other grounds or the renewal of protests based on the content of the request for proposals.

(g) This section applies only to the purchase by the district of computers, telecommunications equipment, automated toll and fare collection equipment, microwave equipment, and other related electronic equipment and apparatus. This section does not apply to contracts for construction or for the procurement of any product available in substantial quantities to the general public.

(h) Provisions in any contract concerning women and minority business enterprises, which provisions are in accordance with the request for proposals, shall not be subject to negotiation with the successful bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20916.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 57.)
-------------------------------------------

20917.

If, after rejecting bids received under Section 20916, the board determines and declares by a two-thirds vote of all of its members that, in its opinion, the equipment, supplies, or materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the board may proceed to purchase the equipment, supplies, or materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or advertisement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

20918.

In case of an emergency, the board may, by resolution passed by a two-thirds vote of all of its members, declare and determine that public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property, and thereupon proceed to expend or enter into a contract involving the expenditure of any sum needed in such emergency without observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or advertisement. If notice for bid to let contracts will not be given, the board shall also comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20919.

Notwithstanding Sections 20916 and 20916.1, the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District may, without further competitive bidding, contract with suppliers of goods and services by participating in contracts let by one or more city, county, city and county, district, school district, public authority, public agency, municipal corporation, or other political subdivision in the state, and to the extent provided by law, any other entity that expends public funds for the procurement of goods and services. This section is in addition to the authority granted in Sections 10298 and 10299. This section does not apply to construction contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 396, Sec. 3.   (SB 622)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 60.4. Job Order Contracting for School Districts [20919.20. - 20919.33.]

20919.20.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this article, to demonstrate an alternative and optional procedure for bidding of public works projects that is applicable only to school districts. The Legislature has previously authorized the use of this alternative and optional procedure
 only for the Los Angeles Unified School District, which is using the procedure in conjunction with its project stabilization agreement.

(b) Districts should be able to utilize cost-effective options for the delivery of public works projects, in accordance with the national trend, which include authorizations in California, to allow public entities to utilize job order contracts as a project delivery method.

(c) The benefits of a job order contract project delivery system include accelerated completion of the projects, cost savings, and reduction of construction contracting complexity for the unified school district.

(d) The job order contracting approach should be used for the purposes of
 reducing project cost and expediting project completion.

(e) The availability of job order contracting as a project delivery method will not preclude the use of traditional methods of project delivery if a traditional method results in higher cost savings.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that job order contracts be competitively bid and awarded to the bidders providing the most qualified responsive bids. It is further the intent of the Legislature that school districts use the job order contract process pursuant to this article only if the school district has entered into a project labor agreement that meets the requirements of Section 2500 for all its public works projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.   (AB 1431)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20919.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20919.21.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Adjustment factor” means the job order contractor’s competitively bid adjustment to the school district’s prices as published in the unit price catalog.

(b) “Indefinite quantity” means one or more of the construction tasks listed in the unit price catalog.

(c) “Job order” means a firm, fixed priced, lump-sum order issued by the school district to a job order contractor for a definite project scope of work as compiled from the unit price catalog to be performed pursuant to a job order contract.

(d) “Job order contract” means a contract, awarded to a most qualified
 bidder as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 20919.24, between the school district and a licensed, bonded, and general liability insured contractor in which the contractor agrees to a fixed period, fixed-unit price, and indefinite quantity contract that provides for the use of job orders for public works or maintenance projects.

(e) “Job order contract technical specifications” means a book, published by the school district, detailing the technical specifications with regard to quality of materials and workmanship to be used by the job order contractor in accomplishing the tasks listed in the unit price catalog.

(f) “Job order contractor” means a licensed, bonded, and general liability insured contractor awarded a job order contract.

(g) “Offer to perform work” means the job order contractor’s
 proposal for a specific job order.

(h) “Plans and specifications” means the unit price catalog and the job order contract technical specifications. The scope of work to be performed with a job order contract is potentially, but not necessarily, all the tasks published in the unit price catalog.

(i) “Project” means the specific requirements and work to be accomplished by the job order contractor in connection with an individual job order.

(j) “Project labor agreement” means an agreement that meets the requirements of Section 2500.

(k) “Project scope of work” means the document and related drawings, specifications, and writings referenced therein which together set forth the specific requirements and work to be accomplished by the job order contractor in
 connection with an individual job order.

(l) “Proposal” means the job order contractor prepared document quoting those construction tasks listed in the unit price catalog that the job order contractor requires to complete the project scope of work, together with the appropriate quantities of each task. The pricing of each task shall be accomplished by multiplying the construction task unit price by the proposed quantity and the contractor’s competitively bid adjustment factor. The proposal shall also contain a schedule for the completion of a specific project scope of work as requested by the school district. The proposal may also contain approved drawings, work schedule, permits, or other documentation as the school district may require for a specific job order. The proposal shall be certified as contract compliant by a reviewer independent of the contractor.

(m) “Public works”
 has the same meaning as in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(n) “Public works project” has the same meaning as “public project,” as defined in Section 22002.

(o) “Subcontractor” means any person, firm, or corporation, other than the employees of the job order contractor, who is bonded and general liability insured and who contracts to furnish labor, or labor and materials, at the worksite or in connection with a job order, whether directly or indirectly on behalf of the job order contractor.

(p) “School district” means any school district.

(q) “Unit price catalog” means a book containing specific construction tasks and the unit prices to install or demolish that construction. The listed tasks shall be
 based on generally accepted industry standards and information, where available, for various items of work to be performed by the job order contractor. The prices shall include the cost of materials, labor, and equipment for performing the items of work. The prices shall not include overhead and profit. All unit prices shall be developed using local prevailing wages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   (AB 618)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20919.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20919.22.

Provisions in this article only apply to school districts that choose to utilize job order contracting. A school district may utilize job order contracting, when permitted by this article, as an alternative to any contracting procedures that the school district is otherwise authorized or required by law to use.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.   (AB 1431)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20919.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20919.23.

(a) The school district may utilize job order contracting pursuant to this article only if the school district has entered into a project labor agreement or agreements that will apply to all public works awarded through job order contracting and to all other public works of the school district that exceed a monetary threshold set by the school district until January 1, 2027, regardless of what contracting procedure is used to award that work.

(b) The school district shall prepare an execution plan for all modernization projects that may be eligible for job order contracting pursuant to this article. The school district shall select from that plan a sufficient number of projects to be initiated as job order contracts during each calendar year and shall determine
 for each selected project that job order contracting will reduce the total cost of that project. Job order contracting shall not be used if the school district finds that it will increase the total cost of the project.

(c) (1) An entity awarded a job order contract in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall provide an enforceable commitment to the school district that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the job order contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if the job order contract is subject to a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the job order
 contract to use a skilled and trained workforce to perform the job order contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 303, Sec. 3.   (AB 846)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20919.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20919.24.

Bidding for job order contracts shall progress as follows:

(a) (1) The school district shall prepare a set of documents for job order contracts. The documents shall include a unit price catalog and preestablished unit prices, job order contract technical specifications, and any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the school district’s needs.

(2) Any architect, engineer, consultant, or contractor retained by the school district to assist in the development of the job order contract documents shall not be eligible to bid or to participate in the preparation of a bid with any job order contractor.

(b) Based on the documents prepared under subdivision (a), the school district shall prepare a request for bid that invites prequalified job order contractors to submit competitive sealed bids in the manner prescribed by the school district.

(1) (A) The prequalified job order contractors, as determined by the school district, shall bid one or more adjustment factors to the unit prices listed in the unit price catalog based on the job order contract technical specifications. Awards shall be made to the prequalified bidders that the school district determines to be the most qualified based upon preestablished criteria made by the school district. The prequalified bidders shall be in compliance with the school district’s project labor agreement.

(B) Compliance shall constitute no more than three major violations on any school district projects within the last three years. If a contractor has more than three violations within a three-year period of time, the school district shall seek administrative review of the violations. Violations will include, but are not limited to, the following:

(i) Failure to register core workers with the appropriate building trade union.

(ii) Failure to assign apprentices in accordance with Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code.

(iii) Failure to comply with subdivision (c) of Section 20919.25.

(iv) Incorrect
 assignment of work in accordance with the school district’s project labor agreement.

(2) The school district may award multiple job order contracts through a request for bid. Job order contracts shall be awarded to the most qualified prequalified bidders described in this subdivision.

(3) The request for bids may encourage the participation of local construction firms and the use of local subcontractors.

(c) (1) The school district shall establish a procedure to prequalify job order contractors using a standard questionnaire that includes, at a minimum, the issues covered by the standardized questionnaire and model guidelines for rating bidders developed by the Department of Industrial Relations
 pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 20101. This questionnaire shall require information including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) If the job order contractor is a partnership, limited partnership, or other association, a listing of all of the partners or association members known at the time of bid submission who
 will participate in the job order contract.

(B) Evidence that the members of the job order contractor have the capacity to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity, and that proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage the construction of the project, as well as a financial statement that assures the school district that the job order contractor has the capacity to complete the project.

(C) The licenses, registration, and credentials required to perform construction, including, but not limited to, information on the revocation or suspension of any license, credential, or registration.

(D) Evidence that establishes that the job order contractor has the
 capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding and liability insurance.

(E) Information concerning workers’ compensation experience history, worker safety programs, and apprenticeship programs.

(F) A full disclosure regarding all of the following that are applicable:

(i) Any serious or willful violation of Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code or the federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-596), settled against any member of the job order contractor.

(ii) Any debarment, disqualification, or removal from a federal, state, or local government public works project.

(iii) Any instance where the job order contractor, or its owners, officers, or managing employees submitted a bid on a public works project and were found to be nonresponsive, or were found by an awarding body not to be a responsible bidder.

(iv) Any instance where the job order contractor, or its owners, officers, or managing employees defaulted on a construction contract.

(v) Any violations of the Contractors’ State License Law (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), excluding alleged violations of federal or state law regarding the payment of wages, benefits, apprenticeship requirements, or personal income tax withholding, or of Federal Insurance Contribution
 Act (FICA) withholding requirements settled against any member of the job order contractor.

(vi) Any bankruptcy or receivership of any member of the job order contractor, including, but not limited to, information concerning any work completed by a surety.

(vii) Any settled adverse claims, disputes, or lawsuits between the owner of a public works project and any member of the job order contractor during the five years preceding submission of a bid under this article, in which the claim, settlement, or judgment exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Information shall also be provided concerning any work completed by a surety during this period.

(G) In the case of a partnership or any association that is not a legal
 entity, a copy of the agreement creating the partnership or association and specifying that all partners or association members agree to be fully liable for the performance under the job order contract.

(2) The information required under this subdivision shall be verified under oath by the entity and its members in the manner in which civil pleadings in civil actions are verified. Information that is not a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) shall not be open to public inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 132.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20919.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20919.25.

(a) The maximum total dollar amount that may be awarded under a single job order contract shall not exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) in the first term of the job order contract and, if extended or renewed pursuant to subdivision (b), a maximum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) over the subsequent two terms of the job order contract.

(b) Job order contracts may be executed for an initial contract term of no more than 12 months, with the option of extending or renewing the job order contract for two 12-month periods. The term of the job order contract shall be for the contract term or whenever the maximum value of the contract is achieved, whichever
 is less. All extensions or renewals shall be priced as provided in the request for bids. The extension or renewal shall be mutually agreed to by the school district and the job order contractor.

(c) The school district may issue job orders to the job order contractor that has been awarded the job order contract. The job order issued to the job order contractor shall not commence for seven days from the time the job order was issued and the job order contractor shall provide a minimum of seven days’ notice for the addition of any subcontractor or substitution of any subcontractor as described in subdivision (e) of Section 20919.26. The job order shall be based on a project scope of work prepared by the school district as well as a proposal from the job order contractor who is awarded the job order contract. No single job order may exceed one
 million dollars ($1,000,000).

(d) The amounts specified in subdivisions (a) and (c) shall be adjusted on January 1, 2016, as if this section was operative beginning January 1, 2004, to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index, and shall be adjusted each January 1 thereafter to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index. 

(e) It is unlawful to split or separate into smaller job orders any project for the purpose of evading the cost limitation provisions of this chapter.

(f) All work performed under the job order contract shall be covered by a project labor agreement.

(g) Any change or alteration to a job
 order shall be in compliance with Section 20118.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.   (AB 1431)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20919.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20919.26.

(a) All work bid under the job order contract shall comply with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 and is subject to all of the penalties and provisions set forth in that chapter.

(b) For purposes of this article, if the primary job order contractor chooses to use subcontractors, the primary job order contractor is required to verify that the subcontractors possess the appropriate licenses and credentials required to perform construction.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the primary job order contractor may use subcontractors that are not listed at the time the job order is
 issued if the work to be performed under that job order is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(d) If the primary job order contractor chooses to use a subcontractor that is not listed at the time of bid to perform work on a job order, all of the following apply:

(1) The primary job order contractor shall provide public notice of the availability of work to be subcontracted by trade. The public notice shall include the scope of work; the project location; the name, address, and the telephone number of the primary job order contractor; and the closing date, time, and location for sealed bids to be submitted.

(2) The primary job order contractor shall take sealed bids from the subcontractors solicited for the proposal.
 These bids shall be publicly opened at a prescribed time and place by the primary job order contractor. After the bids are opened, the job order contractor shall notify the school district which subcontractor was selected.

(3) The notification shall include every subcontractor for all tiers and must establish the authorized subcontractor list for the job order. Work shall not commence prior to seven days’ notice of the established subcontractor list and the subsequent addition of any subcontractor to the job order.

(4) The notification shall identify the scope of the work to be performed by each subcontractor to the job order, broken down by craft. If a subcontractor performs multiple crafts, the job order contractor shall identify the work of each craft to be performed.

(e) If the primary job order contractor chooses to make a substitution to the subcontractor list, the primary job order contractor shall provide a minimum of seven days’ notice to the school district along with justification as to the need for the substitution. The school district may request a hearing to evaluate the substitution request, which shall be in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(f) If the school district determines that there has been a violation of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1, including bid shopping by the primary job order contractor, the school district may terminate the job order or the contractor may lose authorization to proceed with awarded work subject to the school district’s administrative due process
 review, if such review is established pursuant to the school district’s project labor agreement. If the school district determines that a job order contractor has violated any provision set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1, the school district may declare the contractor ineligible for future job orders and may result in a loss of prequalification status for a period of time to be determined by the school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.   (AB 1431)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20919.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20919.27.

(a) A job order contract shall set forth in the general conditions of the job order contract the party or parties responsible for seeing that the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code are complied with.

(b) For purposes of job order contracting, prevailing wages when required to be paid shall apply to all work ordered under the job order contract regardless of thresholds set forth in Section 1771.5 of the Labor Code.

(c) The job order contractor shall pay the prevailing wage in effect at the time the job order is issued by the
 school district and all increases as published by the Department of Industrial Relations for the term of the job order contract, including all overtime, holiday, and shift provisions published by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(d) The school district shall designate one individual to act as a monitor to inspect job sites for labor compliance violations at the request of the designated labor representative in its project labor agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.   (AB 1431)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20919.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20919.28.

A willful violation of Section 20919.26 occurs when the job order contractor or subcontractor knew or reasonably should have known of his or her obligations under the public works law and deliberately fails or refuses to comply with its provisions. The school district using job order contracting shall publish and distribute to the Labor Commissioner a list of all job order contractors or subcontractors who violate this provision and the school district shall not award a job order contract or any future job orders under an existing job order contract to any contractor or subcontractor who violates this provision during the effective period of debarment of the contractor or subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.   (AB 1431)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20919.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20919.29.

For purposes of employment of apprentices on job order contracts, when the individual job order involves more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or 20 working days, all general contractors or subcontractors shall at all times be in compliance with Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code and shall comply with the following:

(a) Prior to commencing work on an individual job order, every contractor shall submit job order award information to an applicable apprenticeship program that can supply apprentices to the site of the job order. The information submitted shall include an estimate of the journeyman hours to be performed under the contract, the number of apprenticeships proposed to
 be employed, and the approximate dates the apprentices would be employed. A copy of this information shall also be submitted to the awarding agency if requested by the awarding agency.

(b) The ratio of work performed by apprentices to journeymen employed in a particular craft or trade on the job order may be no higher than the ratio stipulated in the apprenticeship standard under which the apprenticeship program operates where the job order contractor agrees to be bound by those standards but, except as otherwise provided in Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code, in no case shall the ratio be less than one hour of apprenticeship work for every five hours of journeyman work.

(c) Every apprentice employed under the job order contract shall be paid the prevailing rate of per diem
 wages for apprentices in the trade to which he or she is registered and shall be employed only at the work of the craft or trade to which he or she is registered.

(d) Every apprentice employed under the job order contract shall be hired from the local joint labor management apprenticeship committee that has jurisdiction in the geographic area of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.   (AB 1431)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20919.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20919.30.

A job order contractor or subcontractor that knowingly violates the provisions involving employment of apprentices shall forfeit as a civil penalty an amount not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for each full calendar day of noncompliance. The amount of this penalty shall be based on consideration of whether the violation was a good faith mistake due to inadvertence. A contractor or subcontractor that knowingly commits a second or subsequent violation of the provisions involving employment of apprentices within a three-year period where the noncompliance results in apprenticeship training not being provided as required, shall forfeit as a civil penalty a sum of not more than three hundred dollars ($300) for each full calendar day of
 noncompliance and shall not be awarded any further job orders under the job order contract and shall be precluded for a period of one year from bidding on any future job order contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.   (AB 1431)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20919.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20919.31.
